Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3769.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.445, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Screening of inmates. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end All persons detained or confined deleted text begin for 14 consecutive days or moredeleted text end in facilities operated, licensed, or inspected by the Department of Corrections shall be screened for tuberculosisnew text begin within 14 days of intake and annually tested thereafter. Inmates must be screenednew text end with either a Mantoux testnew text begin , a Quantiferon Gold-Plus blood test,new text end or a chest roentgenogram (x-ray) as consistent with screening and follow-up practices recommended by the United States Public Health Service or the Department of Health, as determined by the commissioner of health. deleted text begin Administration of the Mantoux test or chest roentgenogram (x-ray) must take place on or before the 14th day of detention or confinement.deleted text end deleted text begin (b) If an inmate refuses to submit to an annual test as specified in paragraph (a), the commissioner of corrections may order the inmate to be tested. deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.445, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Procedures without consent. new text end new text begin (a) If an inmate refuses to submit to an intake or annual tuberculosis test as specified in subdivision 1, the commissioner of corrections may order the inmate to be tested and may bring a petition for a court to require an inmate to submit to tuberculosis testing. The petition must be filed in the district court in the county where the inmate is confined. The correctional facility must serve the petition on the inmate three days before a hearing on the petition. The petition must include one or more affidavits attesting that: new text end new text begin (1) the correctional facility attempted to complete the intake or annual testing required under subdivision 1 and that the inmate refused; and new text end new text begin (2) the inmate was offered all three tuberculosis testing options under subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) Facilities must cooperate with petitioners in providing any necessary affidavits to the extent that facility staff can attest under oath to the facts in the affidavits. new text end new text begin (c) The court must conduct the proceeding in camera unless the petitioner or the inmate requests a hearing in open court and the court determines that a public hearing is necessary to the public interest and the proper administration of justice. new text end new text begin (d) The inmate may arrange for counsel in any proceeding brought under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (e) The court may order the inmate to submit to tuberculosis testing, including providing a blood sample for testing to comply with the requirements under subdivision 1, if: new text end new text begin (1) there is probable cause; or new text end new text begin (2) the court finds that an inmate has not been screened or tested under subdivision 1. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.445, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Screening of employees. All employees of facilities operated, licensed, or inspected by the Department of Corrections shall be screened for tuberculosis before new text begin beginning new text end employment in the facility and annually thereafter, with either a Mantoux testnew text begin , Quantiferon Gold-Plus blood test,new text end or a chest roentgenogram (X-ray) as consistent with screening and follow-up practices recommended by the United States Public Health Service or the Department of Health, as determined by the commissioner of health. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.021, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Substance use disorder treatment programs. All deleted text begin residentialdeleted text end substance use disorder treatment programs operated by the commissioner of corrections to treat deleted text begin adultsdeleted text end new text begin individualsnew text end committed to the commissioner's custody deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin or to treat juveniles in state-operated juvenile correctional facilities that have a correctional program services certification per Minnesota Rules, chapter 2960, must new text end comply with the standards mandated in chapter 245G for treatment programs operated by community-based treatment facilities. When the commissioners of corrections and human services agree that these established standards for community-based programs cannot reasonably apply to correctional facilities, alternative equivalent standards shall be developed by the commissioners and established through an interagency agreement. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.69, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority; rules. The commissioner of corrections shall, in accordance with applicable rules and standards prescribed by the Department of Human Services, establish, staff, equip, maintain, and operate new text begin in new text end at new text begin least new text end one of the adult correctional institutions under the commissioner's control a mental health unit for the care and treatment of those inmates of state correctional institutions who become mentally ill. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.69, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Transfer. If the licensed mental health professional finds the person to be a person who is mentally ill and in need of short-term care, new text begin assessment, evaluation, or stabilization, new text end the licensed mental health professional may recommend transfer by the commissioner of corrections to deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end mental health unit established pursuant to subdivision 1. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.69, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Commitment. If the licensed mental health professional finds the person to be a person who is mentally ill and in need of long-term care in a hospital, deleted text begin or if an inmate transferred pursuant to subdivision 3 refuses to voluntarily participate in the treatment program at the mental health unit,deleted text end the director of psychological services of the institution or the mental health professional shall initiate proceedings for judicial commitment as provided in section 253B.07. Upon the recommendation of the licensed mental health professional and upon completion of the hearing and consideration of the record, the court may commit the person to deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end mental health unit established in subdivision 1 or to another hospital. A person confined in a state correctional institution for adults who has been adjudicated to be a person who is mentally ill and in need of treatment may be committed to the commissioner of corrections and placed in deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end mental health unit established in subdivision 1. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.69, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Discharge. The director of psychological services of deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end mental health unit established under this section may, subject to the provisions of chapter 253B, provisionally discharge any inmate patient admitted as a person who is mentally ill without discharging the commitment and order the inmate patient's release into the general population of the institution from which admitted, subject to return to the facility for further treatment. When the director of psychological services of the facility certifies that a patient is no longer in need of institutional care for mental illness the director of psychological services shall discharge the patient to the institution from which committed, and the discharge shall also discharge the mental illness commitment. A copy of the certification that the inmate is no longer in need of care for mental illness shall be transmitted to the commissioner of corrections. The commissioner of corrections shall give serious consideration to the aforementioned certification for purposes of their supervision over the inmate upon the inmate's release. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.69, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Transfer upon expiration of sentence. If the sentence of a person who has been adjudicated to be mentally ill and committed to deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end mental health unit established under this section should expire before the person recovers and is discharged therefrom, and, in the judgment of the director of psychological services of the unit, the person requires further hospitalization for mental illness, the person shall be transferred by the commissioner of corrections to a state hospital designated by the Direct Care and Treatment executive board, there to be detained as in the case of other mentally ill persons under judicial commitment.